Utah statutes.
48-1d-401.   Becoming partner.

(1)  Upon formation of a partnership, a person becomes a partner under Subsection 48-1d-202(1).

(2)  After formation of a partnership, a person becomes a partner:

(a)  as provided in the partnership agreement;

(b)  as a result of a transaction effective under Part 10, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication; or

(c)  with the consent of all the partners.

(3)  A person may become a partner without either:

(a)  acquiring a transferable interest; or

(b)  making or being obligated to make a contribution to the partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

